test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-waien_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - waien: # Verb 'to blow (of wind)' - full paradigm
     waien+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: waie
     waien+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: waist
     waien+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: wait
     waien+V+Ind+Prs+Pl: [waiet, waien]

     waien+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: waide
     waien+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: waidest
     waien+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: waide
     waien+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: waiden

     waien+V+Inf:  waien
     waien+V+PrfPrc:  waid
     waien+V+PrsPrc:  waien

     waien+V+Imprt+Sg2:  wai
     waien+V+Imprt+Pl2:  waiet
